Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 5. Allocation of Disbursements During Administration of Trust

§ 3371.
Disbursements from income.

A trustee shall make the following disbursements from income to the extent that they are not disbursements to which subdivision 3331(2)(B) or (C) of this title applies:

one-half of the regular compensation of the trustee and of any person providing investment advisory or custodial services to the trustee;

one-half of all expenses for accountings, judicial proceedings, or other matters that involve both the income and remainder interests;

all of the other ordinary expenses incurred in connection with the administration, management, or preservation of trust property and the distribution of income, including interest, ordinary repairs, regularly recurring taxes assessed against principal, and expenses of a proceeding or other matter that concerns primarily the income interest; and

recurring premiums on insurance covering the loss of a principal asset or the loss of income from or use of the asset.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Trustee fees.

The regular compensation of a trustee or the trustee’s agent includes compensation based on a percentage of either principal or income or both.

Insurance premiums.

The reference in subdivision (4) to “recurring” premiums is intended to distinguish premiums paid annually for fire insurance from premiums on title insurance, each of which covers the loss of a principal asset.
Title insurance premiums would be a principal disbursement under subdivision 3372(a)(5).

Regularly recurring taxes.

The reference to “regularly recurring taxes assessed against principal” includes all taxes regularly imposed on real property and tangible and intangible personal property.

§ 3372.
Disbursements from principal.

A trustee shall make the following disbursements from principal:

the remaining one-half of the disbursements described in subdivisions 3371(1) and (2) of this title;

all of the trustee’s compensation calculated on principal as a fee for acceptance, distribution, or termination, and disbursements made to prepare property for sale;

payments on the principal of a trust debt;

expenses that extend the life of trust property or that change the form of principal to an improvement or accretion to another item of trust property;

expenses of a proceeding that concerns primarily principal, including a proceeding to construe the trust or to protect the trust or its property;

premiums paid on a policy of insurance not described in subdivision 3371(4) of this title of which the trust is the owner and beneficiary;

estate, inheritance, and other transfer taxes, including penalties, apportioned to the trust; and

disbursements related to environmental matters, including reclamation, assessing environmental conditions, remedying and removing environmental contamination, monitoring remedial activities and the release of substances, preventing future releases of substances, collecting amounts from persons liable or potentially liable for the costs of those activities, penalties imposed under environmental laws or regulations and other payments made to comply with those laws or regulations, statutory or common law claims by third parties, and defending claims based on environmental matters.

If a principal asset is encumbered with an obligation that requires income from that asset to be paid directly to the creditor, the trustee shall transfer from principal to income an amount equal to the income paid to the creditor in reduction of the principal balance of the obligation.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Environmental expenses.

All environmental expenses are payable from principal, subject to the power of the trustee to transfer funds to principal from income under section 3374. However, the Drafting Committee decided that it was not necessary to broaden this provision to cover other expenditures made under compulsion of governmental authority. See generally the annotation at 43 A.L.R.4th 1012 (Duty as Between Life Tenant and Remainderman with Respect to Cost of Improvements or Repairs Made Under Compulsion of Governmental Authority).

Environmental expenses paid by a trust are to be paid from principal under subdivision 3372(a)(7) on the assumption that they will usually be extraordinary in nature.
Environmental expenses might be paid from income if the trustee is carrying on a business that uses or sells toxic substances, in which case environmental cleanup costs would be a normal cost of doing business and would be accounted for under section 3353. In accounting under that section, environmental costs will be a factor in determining how much of the net receipts from the business is trust income.
Paying all other environmental expenses from principal is consistent with this Act’s approach regarding receipts - when a receipt is not clearly a current return on a principal asset, it should be added to principal because over time both the income and remainder beneficiaries benefit from this treatment.
Here, allocating payments required by environmental laws to principal imposes the detriment of those payments over time on both the income and remainder beneficiaries.

Under subsections 3374(a) and subdivision 3374(b)(5), a trustee who makes or expects to make a principal disbursement for an environmental expense described in subdivision 3372(a)(7) is authorized to transfer an appropriate amount from income to principal to reimburse principal for disbursements made or to provide a reserve for future principal disbursements.

The first part of subdivision 3372(a)(7) is based upon the definition of an “environmental remediation trust” in Treas. Reg. § 301.7701-4(e) (as amended in 1996).
This is not because the Act applies to an environmental remediation trust, but because the definition is a useful and thoroughly vetted description of the kinds of expenses that a trustee owning contaminated property might incur.
Expenses incurred to comply with environmental laws include the cost of environmental consultants, administrative proceedings and burdens of every kind imposed as the result of an administrative or judicial proceeding, even though the burden is not formally characterized as a penalty.

Title proceedings.

Disbursements that are made to protect a trust’s property, referred to in subdivision 3372(a)(4), include an “action to assure title” that is mentioned in Section 13(c)(2) of the 1962 Act.

Insurance premiums.

Insurance premiums referred to in subdivision 3372(a)(5) include title insurance premiums.
They also include premiums on life insurance policies owned by the trust, which represent the trust’s periodic investment in the insurance policy.
There is no provision in the 1962 Act for life insurance premiums.

Taxes.

Generation-skipping transfer taxes are payable from principal under subsection (a)(6).

Vermont Comment

Disbursements from principal.

The Vermont Act supplements this section in subdivision (4) by adding: “expenses that extend the life of trust property or that change the form of principal to an improvement or accretion to another item of trust property.”

§ 3373.
Transfers from income to principal for depreciation.

As used in this section, “depreciation” means a reduction in value due to wear, tear, decay, corrosion, or gradual obsolescence of a fixed asset having a useful life of more than one year.

A trustee may transfer to principal a reasonable amount of the net cash receipts from a principal asset that is subject to depreciation, but may not transfer any amount for depreciation in the following instances:

of that portion of real property used or available for use by a beneficiary as a residence or of tangible personal property held or made available for the personal use or enjoyment of a beneficiary;

during the administration of a decedent’s estate; or

under this section if the trustee is accounting under section 3353 of this title for the business or activity in which the asset is used.

An amount transferred to principal need not be held as a separate fund.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Prior Acts.

The 1931 Act has no provision for depreciation.
Section 13(a)(2) of the 1962 Act provides that a charge shall be made against income for “... a reasonable allowance for depreciation on property subject to depreciation under generally accepted accounting principles ... .”
That provision has been resisted by many trustees, who do not provide for any depreciation for a variety of reasons.
One reason relied upon is that a charge for depreciation is not needed to protect the remainder beneficiaries if the value of the land is increasing; another is that generally accepted accounting principles may not require depreciation to be taken if the property is not part of a business.
The Drafting Committee concluded that the decision to provide for depreciation should be discretionary with the trustee.
The power to transfer funds from income to principal that is granted by this section is a discretionary power of administration referred to in subsection 3323(b), and in exercising the power a trustee must comply with subsection 3323(b).

One purpose served by transferring cash from income to principal for depreciation is to provide funds to pay the principal of an indebtedness secured by the depreciable property.
Subdivision 3374(b)(4) permits the trustee to transfer additional cash from income to principal for this purpose to the extent that the amount transferred from income to principal for depreciation is less than the amount of the principal payments.

Vermont Comment:

Transfers from income to principal for depreciation.

The Vermont Act adds the phrase “in the following instances” to subsection (b) for purposes of clarity.

§ 3374.
Transfers from income to reimburse principal.

If a trustee makes or expects to make a principal disbursement described in this section, the trustee may transfer an appropriate amount from income to principal in one or more accounting periods to reimburse principal or to provide a reserve for future principal disbursements.

Principal disbursements to which subsection (a) of this section applies include the following, but only to the extent that the trustee has not been and does not expect to be reimbursed by a third party:

an amount chargeable to income but paid from principal because it is unusually large, including extraordinary repairs;

a capital improvement to a principal asset, whether in the form of changes to an existing asset or the construction of a new asset, including special assessments;

disbursements made to prepare property for rental, including tenant allowances, leasehold improvements, and broker’s commissions;

periodic payments on an obligation secured by a principal asset to the extent that the amount transferred from income to principal for depreciation is less than the periodic payments; and

disbursements described in subdivision 3372(a)(7) of this title.

If the asset whose ownership gives rise to the disbursements becomes subject to a successive income interest after an income interest ends, a trustee may continue to transfer amounts from income to principal as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3375.
Income taxes.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee based on receipts allocated to income shall be paid from income.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee based on receipts allocated to principal shall be paid from principal, even if the tax is called an income tax by the taxing authority.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee on the trust’s share of an entity’s taxable income shall be paid:

from income to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocated only to income;

from principal to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocated only to principal;

proportionately from principal and income to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocated to both income and principal; and

from principal to the extent that the tax exceeds the total receipts from the entity.

After applying subsections (a) through (c) of this section, the trustee shall adjust income or principal receipts to the extent that the trust’s taxes are reduced because the trust receives a deduction for payments made to a beneficiary.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Taxes on undistributed entity taxable income.

When a trust owns an interest in a pass-through entity, such as a partnership or S corporation, it must report its share of the entity’s taxable income regardless of how much the entity distributes to the trust. Whether the entity distributes more or less than the trust’s tax on its share of the entity’s taxable income, the trust must pay the taxes and allocate them between income and principal.

Subsection (c) requires the trust to pay the taxes on its share of an entity’s taxable income from income or principal receipts to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocable to each. This assures the trust a source of cash to pay some or all of the taxes on its share of the entity’s taxable income. Subsection (d) recognizes that, except in the case of an Electing Small Business Trust (ESBT), a trust normally receives a deduction for amounts distributed to a beneficiary. Accordingly, subsection (d) requires the trust to increase receipts payable to a beneficiary as determined under subsection (c) to the extent the trust’s taxes are reduced by distributing those receipts to the beneficiary.

Because the trust’s taxes and amounts distributed to a beneficiary are interrelated, the trust may be required to apply a formula to determine the correct amount payable to a beneficiary. This formula should take into account that each time a distribution is made to a beneficiary, the trust taxes are reduced and amounts distributable to a beneficiary are increased. The formula assures that after deducting distributions to a beneficiary, the trust has enough to satisfy its taxes on its share of the entity’s taxable income as reduced by distributions to beneficiaries.

Example (1)

— Trust T receives a Schedule K-1 from Partnership P reflecting taxable income of $1 million. Partnership P distributes $100,000 to T, which allocates the receipts to income. Both Trust T and income Beneficiary B are in the 35 percent tax bracket. Trust T’s tax on $1 million of taxable income is $350,000. Under subsection (c), T’s tax must be paid from income receipts because receipts from the entity are allocated only to income. Therefore, T must apply the entire $100,000 of income receipts to pay its tax. In this case, Beneficiary B receives nothing.

Example (2)

— Trust T receives a Schedule K-1 from Partnership P reflecting taxable income of $1 million. Partnership P distributes $500,000 to T, which allocates the receipts to income. Both Trust T and income Beneficiary B are in the 35 percent tax bracket. Trust T’s tax on $1 million of taxable income is $350,000. Under subsection (c), T’s tax must be paid from income receipts because receipts from P are allocated only to income. Therefore, T uses $350,000 of the $500,000 to pay its taxes and distributes the remaining $150,000 to B. The $150,000 payment to B reduces T’s taxes by $52,500, which it must pay to B. But the $52,500 further reduces T’s taxes by $18,375, which it also must pay to B. In fact, each time T makes a distribution to B, its taxes are further reduced, causing another payment to be due B.

Alternatively, T can apply the following algebraic formula to determine the amount payable to B:

D =(C-R*K)/(1-R)

D = Distribution to income beneficiary

C = Cash paid by the entity to the trust

R = tax rate on income

K = entity’s K-1 taxable income

Applying the formula to Example (2) above, Trust T must pay $230,769 to B so that after deducting the payment, T has exactly enough to pay its tax on the remaining taxable income from P.

Taxable Income per K-1
1,000, 000

Payment to beneficiary
230,769

Trust Taxable Income
769,231

35 percent tax
269,231

Partnership Distribution
500,000

Fiduciary’s Tax Liability
(269,231)

Payable to the Beneficiary
230,769

In addition, B will report $230,769 on his or her own personal income tax return, paying taxes of $80,769. Because Trust T withheld $269,231 to pay its taxes and B paid $80,769 taxes of its own, B bore the entire $350,000 tax burden on the $1 million of entity taxable income, including the $500,000 that the entity retained that presumably increased the value of the trust’s investment entity.

If a trustee determines that it is appropriate to so, it should consider exercising the discretion granted in section 3376 to adjust between income and principal. Alternatively, the trustee may exercise the power to adjust under section 3324 to the extent it is available and appropriate under the circumstances, including whether a future distribution from the entity that would be allocated to principal should be reallocated to income because the income beneficiary already bore the burden of taxes on the reinvested income. In exercising the power, the trust should consider the impact that future distributions will have on any current adjustments.

§ 3376.
Adjustments between principal and income because of taxes.

A fiduciary may make adjustments between principal and income to offset the shifting of economic interests or tax benefits between income beneficiaries and remainder beneficiaries which arise from:

elections and decisions, other than those described in subsection (b) of this section, that the fiduciary makes from time to time regarding tax matters;

an income tax or any other tax that is imposed upon the fiduciary or a beneficiary as a result of a transaction involving or a distribution from the estate or trust; or

subject to subsection (b) of this section, the ownership by an estate or trust of an interest in an entity whose taxable income, whether or not distributed, is includable in the taxable income of the estate, trust, or a beneficiary.

A trustee shall make an adjustment from principal to income to compensate an income beneficiary for taxes paid or payable by the income beneficiary in respect of the taxable income of an entity that is taxable to the income beneficiary but that is distributed to the trustee and allocated to principal.

If the amount of an estate tax marital deduction or charitable contribution deduction is reduced because a fiduciary deducts an amount paid from principal for income tax purposes instead of deducting it for estate tax purposes, and as a result estate taxes paid from principal are increased and income taxes paid by an estate, trust, or beneficiary are decreased, each estate, trust, or beneficiary that benefits from the decrease in income tax shall reimburse the principal from which the increase in estate tax is paid. The total reimbursement shall equal the increase in the estate tax to the extent that the principal used to pay the increase would have qualified for a marital deduction or charitable contribution deduction but for the payment. The proportionate share of the reimbursement for each estate, trust, or beneficiary whose income taxes are reduced shall be the same as its proportionate share of the total decrease in income tax. An estate or trust shall reimburse principal from income.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Discretionary adjustments.

Subsection 3376(a) permits the fiduciary to make adjustments between income and principal because of tax law provisions.
It would permit discretionary adjustments in situations like these:
(1) A fiduciary elects to deduct administration expenses that are paid from principal on an income tax return instead of on the estate tax return; (2) a distribution of a principal asset to a trust or other beneficiary causes the taxable income of an estate or trust to be carried out to the distributee and relieves the persons who receive the income of any obligation to pay income tax on the income; or (3) a trustee realizes a capital gain on the sale of a principal asset and pays a large state income tax on the gain, but under applicable federal income tax rules the trustee may not deduct the state income tax payment from the capital gain in calculating the trust’s federal capital gain tax, and the income beneficiary receives the benefit of the deduction for state income tax paid on the capital gain.
See generally Joel C. Dobris, Limits on the Doctrine of Equitable Adjustment in Sophisticated Postmortem Tax Planning, 66 Iowa L. Rev. 273 (1981).

Subdivision 3376(a)(3) applies to a qualified Subchapter S trust (QSST) whose income beneficiary is required to include a pro rata share of the S corporation’s taxable income in his return.
If the QSST does not receive a cash distribution from the corporation that is large enough to cover the income beneficiary’s tax liability, the trustee may distribute additional cash from principal to the income beneficiary.
In this case the retention of cash by the corporation benefits the trust principal.
This situation could occur if the corporation’s taxable income includes capital gain from the sale of a business asset and the sale proceeds are reinvested in the business instead of being distributed to shareholders.

Mandatory adjustment.

Subsection (b) provides for a mandatory adjustment from income to principal to the extent needed to preserve an estate tax marital deduction or charitable contributions deduction.
It is derived from New York’s EPTL § 11-1.2(A), which requires principal to be reimbursed by those who benefit when a fiduciary elects to deduct administration expenses on an income tax return instead of the estate tax return.
Unlike the New York provision, subsection (b) limits a mandatory reimbursement to cases in which a marital deduction or a charitable contributions deduction is reduced by the payment of additional estate taxes because of the fiduciary’s income tax election.
It is intended to preserve the result reached in
Estate of Britenstool v. Commissioner,
46 T.C. 711 (1966), in which the Tax Court held that a reimbursement required by the predecessor of EPTL § 11-1.2(A) resulted in the estate receiving the same charitable contributions deduction it would have received if the administration expenses had been deducted for estate tax purposes instead of for income tax purposes. Because a fiduciary will elect to deduct administration expenses for income tax purposes only when the income tax reduction exceeds the estate tax reduction, the effect of this adjustment is that the principal is placed in the same position it would have occupied if the fiduciary had deducted the expenses for estate tax purposes, but the income beneficiaries receive an additional benefit.
For example, if the income tax benefit from the deduction is $30,000 and the estate tax benefit would have been $20,000, principal will be reimbursed $20,000 and the net benefit to the income beneficiaries will be $10,000.

Irrevocable grantor trusts.

Under sections 671-679 of the Internal Revenue Code (the “grantor trust” provisions), a person who creates an irrevocable trust for the benefit of another person may be subject to tax on the trust’s income or capital gains, or both, even though the settlor is not entitled to receive any income or principal from the trust. Because this is now a well-known tax result, many trusts have been created to produce this result, but there are also trusts that are unintentionally subject to this rule.
The Act does not require or authorize a trustee to distribute funds from the trust to the settlor in these cases because it is difficult to establish a rule that applies only to trusts where this tax result is unintended and does not apply to trusts where the tax result is intended.
Settlors who intend this tax result rarely state it as an objective in the terms of the trust, but instead rely on the operation of the tax law to produce the desired result.
As a result it may not be possible to determine from the terms of the trust if the result was intentional or unintentional.
If the drafter of such a trust wants the trustee to have the authority to distribute principal or income to the settlor to reimburse the settlor for taxes paid on the trust’s income or capital gains, such a provision should be placed in the terms of the trust. In some situations the Internal Revenue Service may require that such a provision be placed in the terms of the trust as a condition to issuing a private letter ruling.

Vermont Comments

Adjustments between principal and income because of taxes.

The Vermont Act adds subsection (b), which is based on language contained in Maryland’s version of the Act. Subsections (a) and (c) are unchanged.